District of Columbia statutes.
29-306.02

Qualifications of directors.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may prescribe qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of the District or a shareholder of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws so prescribe.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720